Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1527
Change from commissioner to township form of government; use of county road fund for maintenance of township roads.

It shall be lawful in all counties changing from the commissioner form of government to township organization, for such counties to continue for a period of one year after adoption of township organization to use funds from the county road fund to maintain township roads.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. II, § 27, p. 523.